Vermont, session 2025-2026, S188.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 1905a is added to read:
§ 1905a. HOSPITAL BOARD OF DIRECTORS; REPRESENTATIVES OF
THE PUBLIC; COMPENSATION COMMITTEE
(a) Public members.
(1) Two voting members of a hospital’s board of directors, but in no
event less than one-sixth of the board of directors, shall be representatives of
the public appointed by the Governor. Unless otherwise specified, a
VT LEG #386107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.188
2026 Page 2 of 6
representative of the public shall have the same rights and responsibilities as
any other member of the hospital board.
(2) The Governor may appoint as a representative of the public any
member of the public, including a health care professional.
(3) The initial term of one representative of the public shall be two years
and the initial term of the other representative of the public shall be three years.
If there are more than two representatives of the public, their initial terms shall
be divided as equally as possible between the two initial term lengths.
Thereafter, each representative of the public appointed by the Governor to
succeed a representative of the public shall serve a three-year term and shall
serve until a successor is appointed.
(4) A representative of the public shall be terminated only by the
appointing authority, by conclusion of the appointed term, or by voluntary
resignation.
(5) If a vacancy occurs prior to the conclusion of the three-year term,
whether by termination, resignation, or otherwise, the Governor shall appoint a
new representative of the public to complete the term.
(b) Committees.
(1) The board of directors may create one or more committees and may
appoint members of the board, including the representatives of the public, to
serve on them.
VT LEG #386107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.188
2026 Page 3 of 6
(2) The board shall create a compensation committee to review and
recommend to the full board for approval all compensation packages offered to
the hospital’s officers and executives.
(A) The compensation committee shall be composed of two or more
members, who shall serve at the pleasure of the board of directors.
(B) At least two representatives of the public shall be voting
members of the compensation committee.
(c) Guiding principles for representatives of the public. In discharging the
duties of a director, including as a member of a committee, each representative
of the public:
(1) shall, in determining what the representative of the public reasonably
believes to be in the best interests of the hospital, consider the effects of any
action or inaction on:
(A) patients of the hospital;
(B) employees of the hospital; and
(C) the community and societal considerations of the State of
Vermont, including the principles for health care reform expressed in section
9371 of this title;
(2) may consider any other relevant factors and the interests of any other
group that the representative of the public determines are appropriate to
consider; and
VT LEG #386107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.188
2026 Page 4 of 6
(3) shall not be required to give priority to the interests of any particular
person or group described in subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection over the
interests of any other person or group.
(d) No violation of Title 11B. The consideration of interests and factors in
the manner described in subsection (c) of this section shall not constitute a
violation of Title 11B.
(e) Limitations on liability.
(1) A representative of the public is not liable for the failure of the
hospital to create general or specific impacts on the community or the health
care system.
(2) A representative of the public is not liable to the hospital for any
action or failure to take action in the representative’s official capacity if the
representative of the public performed the duties of the office in compliance
with Title 11B and this section. In the event of a conflict between Title 11B
and this section, this section shall control.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 9455 is added to read:
§ 9455. COMPENSATION OF HOSPITAL EXECUTIVES
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Compensation” means total cash compensation, including base
salary and annual incentive compensation.
VT LEG #386107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.188
2026 Page 5 of 6
(2) “Executives” means the president, chief executive officer, chief
medical officer, chief administrative officer, chief fiscal officer, vice
presidents, and all functionally equivalent roles in a hospital’s administration.
(b) On or before July 1, 2026, and prior to approving any changes to the
compensation of any hospital executive, each hospital shall file with the Green
Mountain Care Board a statement sworn to by the chair of the hospital’s board
of directors and the chief executive officer of the hospital that includes the
following information regarding compensation paid to hospital executives:
(1) all compensation benchmarks utilized in connection with
establishing or awarding compensation for each of the hospital’s executives,
including information used by any consultant, vendor, or other third party
retained by the hospital;
(2) a detailed compensation survey or peer group data used by the
hospital or by any consultant, vendor, or other third party retained by the
hospital to establish compensation benchmarks or otherwise to establish or
award compensation for each hospital executive; and
(3) if any bonus or variable compensation was awarded or paid for the
prior hospital fiscal year, the criteria used to evaluate whether that
compensation should be paid or awarded and the specific results that supported
the payment.
VT LEG #386107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.188
2026 Page 6 of 6
(c) The Board may require the hospital to modify a group described in
subdivision (b)(2) of this section if, in the Board’s discretion, the group
contains entities that are not sufficiently similar to the hospital in terms of size,
patient volume, payer mix, operations, nonprofit status, or other factors.
(d) The Board may retain at the hospital’s expense such consultants and
other experts as are reasonably necessary to assist the Board in evaluating the
materials provided pursuant to this section. Any persons so retained shall be
under the direction and control of the Board and shall act in a purely advisory
capacity.
(e) Notwithstanding any provision of section 9457 of this chapter to the
contrary, a hospital may designate material provided to the Board under this
section as proprietary or confidential, and the Board shall maintain the
confidentiality of the information as appropriate under the Public Records Act.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386107 v.1